District of Columbia statutes.
48-804.03

Inspection of pricing records and practices; cease and desist orders.

After reasonable notice, the Office of Consumer Protection may inspect the pricing records and practices of any pharmacy or other person, to assure compliance with this chapter. After appropriate notice and hearing, the Office may, if it finds that any person has violated this chapter, issue a cease and desist order against continued or future violation, and such other orders as may otherwise be within powers of that Office.

Sept. 10, 1976, D.C. Law 1-81, title IV, § 403, 23 DCR 2460
1981 Ed., § 33-743.
1973 Ed., § 33-843.